Hawaii statutes.
§831-5 Certificate of discharge. (a)
If the sentence was in this State, the order, certificate, or other instrument
of discharge, given to a person sentenced for a felony upon the person's
discharge after completion of service of the person's sentence or after service
under probation or parole, shall state that the defendant's rights to vote and
to hold any future public office, of which the defendant was deprived by this
chapter, are thereby restored and that the defendant suffers no other
disability by virtue of the defendant's conviction and sentence except as
otherwise provided by this chapter. A copy of the order or other instrument of
discharge shall be filed with the clerk of the court of conviction.

(b) If the sentence was in another state or in
a federal court and the convicted person has similarly been discharged by the
appropriate authorities, the director of social services of this State, upon
application and proof of the discharge in such form as the director of social
services may require, shall issue a certificate stating that such rights have
been restored to the convicted person under the laws of this State.

(c) If another state having an act similar to
this chapter issues its certificate of discharge to a convicted person stating
that the defendant's rights have been restored, the rights of which the
defendant was deprived in this State under this chapter are restored to the
defendant in this State. [L 1969, c 250, pt of §1; HRS §716-5; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Note

Director of social services renamed. L 1987, c 339, §2.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next